Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Wyoming State Board of Medicine

§ 33-26-201.
State board of medicine; composition; appointment; terms; qualifications; removal; vacancies; quorum.

The Wyoming state board of medicine shall consist of five (5) physicians licensed to practice medicine in Wyoming, not less than one (1) of whom shall possess the degree of doctor of osteopathy and not less than two (2) of whom shall possess the degree of doctor of medicine, one (1) physician assistant and two (2) lay members, appointed by the governor by and with the consent of the senate as required by W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. Board members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The board members shall annually elect a president, a vice-president, and a secretary.

Board members shall serve four (4) year terms. No board member shall serve more than three (3) consecutive terms.

Physician and physician assistant members shall reside in, hold a full and unrestricted license and actively practice in this state. Lay members shall reside in this state.

The governor shall appoint a new board member if a vacancy occurs. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the unexpired portion of the vacated term. A vacancy occurs if a member:

Is absent from three (3) consecutive meetings;

No longer holds a full and unrestricted license to practice in this state or no longer engages in active practice in this state;

Resigns; or

Is removed by the governor.

A quorum of the board consists of five (5) board members, including a lay member, unless otherwise specified in subsection (f) of this section.

If the board president determines that due to conflicts of interest or other circumstances it may not be possible to seat a quorum of board members to hear a disciplinary case brought pursuant to this act, the president may submit a written request to the governor for the appointment of one (1) or more acting board members to hear the disciplinary case in question. Upon receipt of the request, the governor shall appoint the requested number of temporary board members for the sole purpose of hearing the disciplinary case in question. Only persons who previously served as members of the board shall be eligible for temporary appointment to hear disciplinary cases before the board. Appointments made under this subsection shall not require the consent of the senate pursuant to W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. Persons appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be compensated and have their expenses reimbursed in the same manner as regular board members under W.S. 33-26-203(c). The appointment of a person under this subsection shall automatically terminate upon the entering of a final order in the disciplinary case for which he was appointed.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 2189, 2190; Laws 1905, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 2865, 2866; Laws 1917, ch. 111, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 3513, 3514; R.S. 1931, §§ 86-101, 86-102; C.S. 1945, §§ 37-2001, 37-2002; Laws 1957, ch. 194, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-328, 33-329; Laws 1965, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

33-26-102

,

33-26-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 78, § 1; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2001, ch. 166, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “not less than one (1) of whom shall possess the degree of doctor of osteopathy and not less than two (2) of whom shall possess the degree of doctor of medicine, one (1) physician assistant and two (2) lay members” for “one (1) of whom shall possess the degree of doctor of osteopathy, one (1) physician assistant and two (2) lay members not directly related to physicians” in (a); added “unless otherwise specified in subsection (f) of this section” at the end of (e); and added (f).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

Presence of members. —

Conduct defined. —

Presence of members. —

Authorization to appoint temporary Wyoming Board of Medicine members does not suggest that members must be present in order to constitute a quorum. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Conduct defined. —

Statute permits the Wyoming Board of Medicine president to petition the governor to appoint temporary members if the Board cannot seat a quorum to hear the case; because the term “conduct” does not require the Board to attend contested case hearings in person, the agency rules are not in conflict with the statute. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

§ 33-26-202.
Board; duties; general powers.

The board shall pass upon the qualifications and determine the fitness of all persons desiring to practice medicine in this state.

The board is empowered and directed to:

Grant, refuse to grant, suspend, restrict, revoke, reinstate or renew licenses to practice medicine;

Investigate allegations and take disciplinary action on the following grounds:

A licensee is impaired or has engaged in errant conduct;

A person has violated an applicable provision of this chapter or the board’s regulations.

Conduct informal interviews and contested case proceedings;

Adopt a seal;

Adopt, amend, repeal, enforce and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter;

Develop standards governing the delegation of a licensee’s medical responsibilities to nonphysicians;

Publish annually and submit to the governor a report which includes the following information:

A summary of the kind and number of action taken by the board including dates, types and origin of oral or written complaints received and case summaries of physicians whose licenses have been suspended or revoked and any other disciplinary actions;

Board fiscal transactions for the preceding year, the amount of its accumulated cash and securities and a balance sheet showing its financial condition by means of an actuarial valuation of board assets and liabilities.

Publicize information regarding the filing of complaints;

Comply with all applicable federal law;

Verify the status of licenses and privileges held by licensees and applicants for licensure with the federation of state medical boards, medical licensing boards in other jurisdictions and federal data banks, and to provide verification of the status of licenses held in this state by licensees to the entities specified in this paragraph;

Annually review any licensee whose license is restricted or is issued subject to any condition;

Participate in and contract with a program or programs to assist in the return to practice of licensees who have exhibited disruptive behaviors, substance dependence or abuse or are suffering from physical or mental impairment;

Take all reasonable action, including the promulgation of rules and regulations, necessary to enforce this chapter;

Adopt, amend, repeal, enforce and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to implement and administer continuing medical education requirements of its licensees. The board shall require licensees who are registered with the board of pharmacy to dispense a controlled substance in this state to complete one (1) hour of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances or the treatment of substance abuse disorders every two (2) years.

Publish nonbinding advisory opinions or other guidance on the application and interpretation of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act;

Request criminal history background information for purposes of licensure and discipline, as authorized under W.S. 7-19-106(a);

Use, retain or employ investigators, the offices of the attorney general, the state division of criminal investigation, any other investigatory or fact finding agency and medical specialty consultants, as necessary, to investigate and evaluate complaints against licensees and possible violations of this act and the board’s rules;

Adopt rules and regulations for the practice of medicine in Wyoming by physicians and physician assistants not otherwise licensed in Wyoming in the event of a public health emergency or pandemic;

Adopt rules and regulations for the practice of telemedicine.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2194; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2867; C.S. 1920, § 3515; R.S. 1931, § 86-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-2003; W.S. 1957, § 33-330; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-104; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

rewrote (b)(x) which read: “Verify the status of licenses and privileges held by licensees with the federation of state licensing boards and federal data banks, and,” in (b)(xii), substituted “contract with” for “contribute to” and inserted “or abuse,” and added (b)(xv) through (b)(xix).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(xiv), added the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

Conduct defined. —

Wyoming Board of Medicine conducted a six-day contested case hearing in front of an independent hearing examiner, both parties participated in pre-hearing motion practice, presented evidence, conducted direct and cross-examination of witnesses, and submitted the case to the Board; this satisfied the statutory requirement that the Board “conduct” the contested case proceeding. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Quoted

in

Kirbens v. Wyoming State Bd. of Med., 992 P.2d 1056,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 33-26-203.
Board; employment and salary of executive director; and other employees; compensation of members.

The board may employ or contract with an executive director, board counsel, board prosecutor and other necessary staff. The executive director shall not be a board member.

The executive director’s compensation and terms of employment shall, and board counsel’s and the board prosecutor’s compensation may, be set by the board. The compensation of other staff shall be set by the human resources division of the department of administration and information.

Board members shall receive salary in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature and shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), incurred in the performance of their official duties. Any incidental expenses necessarily incurred by the board or any member, if approved by the board, shall be paid from the account from fees collected pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 2206; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 17; C.S. 1910, § 2881; C.S. 1920, § 3529; R.S. 1931, § 86-117; C.S. 1945, § 37-2017; Laws 1955, ch. 18, § 1; 1957, ch. 152, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-332; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 24, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-106; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to amount of mileage fee or mileage expense to state, county or precinct officer or employee, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “account” in (c)

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), substituted both instances of “executive director” for “executive secretary” and inserted “board prosecutor” in the first sentence; rewrote (b) concerning the executive secretary's salary; and, in (c), rewrote the first sentence which read: “Board members shall not receive compensation for their services but shall receive mileage and per diem in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.”

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses and mileage” in the first sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”